Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.130

Postponement of action.

When only two members are present at a meeting of the board, and a division takes place on any question, the matter under consideration shall be postponed to the next subsequent meeting.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.130. Prior: Code 1881 s 2671; 1869 p 304 s 9; 1867 p 53 s 9; 1863 p 541 s 9; 1854 p 421 s 9; RRS s 4055.]